Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
CHAPTER 3
PARKS, HISTORIC AREAS, MEMORIALS, AND RECREATION

Article 1

General Provisions.

Part 1

G

ENERAL PROVISIONS

.

Part 2

R

ECREATIONAL AUTHORITIES OVERVIEW COMMITTEE

.

Article 2

State Parks and Recreational Areas Generally.

Article 3

Historic Areas.

Part 1

G

ENERAL PROVISIONS

.

Part 2

H

ERITAGE TRUST PROGRAM

.

Part 3

S

UBMERGED CULTURAL RESOURCES

.

Article 4

Natural Areas.

Article 5

Scenic Trails.

Article 6

Memorials.

Part 1

F

RANKLIN D. ROOSEVELT WARM SPRINGS POOLS AND SPRINGS SITE COMMISSION

[Repealed].

Part 2

F

RANKLIN D. ROOSEVELT WARM SPRINGS MEMORIAL

.

Part 3

T

Y COBB MEMORIAL

.

Part 4

S

TONE MOUNTAIN MEMORIAL ASSOCIATION

.

Article 7

Public Authorities.

Part 1

J

EKYLL ISLAND-STATE PARK AUTHORITY

.

Part 2

N

ORTH GEORGIA MOUNTAINS AUTHORITY

.

Part 3

L

AKE LANIER ISLANDS DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY

.

Part 4

K

INCHAFOONEE LAKE AUTHORITY

.

Part 5

T

HE GREAT PARK AUTHORITY

.

Part 6

O

CONEE RIVER GREENWAY AUTHORITY

.

Part 7

S

APELO ISLAND HERITAGE AUTHORITY

.

Part 8

G

EORGIA AGRICULTURAL EXPOSITION AUTHORITY

.

Part 9

G

EORGIA AGRICULTURAL EXPOSITION AUTHORITY OVERVIEW COMMITTEE

.

Part 10

G

EORGIA MUSIC HALL OF FAME AUTHORITY

.

Part 11

Georgia Halls of Fame Authority

Overview Committee.

Part 12

G

EORGIA SPORTS HALL OF FAME AUTHORITY

.

Part 13

G

EORGIA GOLF HALL OF FAME AUTHORITY

.

Article 8

Nongame Wildlife Conservation and

Wildlife Habitat Acquisition

Programs.

Article 9

Protection of Archeological, Aboriginal, Prehistoric, and Historic Sites.

Article 10

Official Gardens And Nature Centers.

Article 11

Georgia Agrirama Development Authority.

Article 12

Power Alley Development Authority.